Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 108. new text end new text begin Officer Jason B. Meyer Memorial Highway. new text end new text begin The segment of marked U.S. Highway 63 from the intersection with marked Trunk Highway 16 to the southerly city limit of Racine is designated as "Officer Jason B. Meyer Memorial Highway." Subject to section 161.139, the commissioner must adopt a suitable design to mark this highway and erect appropriate signs. new text end